src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-niqm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - niʼm: # Noun 76 'eng /est nimi/fin' - full paradigm
     niʼm+N+Sg+Nom: [niʼm, nim]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Gen: [niʼm, nim]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Par: [niʼmmõ, nimmõ]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Dat: [niʼmmõn, nimmõn]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Ins: [niʼmkõks, nimkõks]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Ill: [niʼmmõ, nimmõ]
     niʼm+N+Sg+Ela: [niʼmstõ, nimstõ]
     niʼm+N+Pl+Nom: nimūd
     niʼm+N+Pl+Gen: nimūd
     niʼm+N+Pl+Par: nimīdi
     niʼm+N+Pl+Dat: nimūdõn
     niʼm+N+Pl+Ins: nimūdõks
     niʼm+N+Pl+Ill: nimīž
     niʼm+N+Pl+Ela: nimīst
